Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 2 Form, Formation, and Readjustment of Contract

11-2-201.
Formal requirements; statute of frauds.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section a contract for the sale of goods for the price of $500.00 or more is not enforceable by way of action or defense unless there is some writing sufficient to indicate that a contract for sale has been made between the parties and signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by his authorized agent or broker. A writing is not insufficient because it omits or incorrectly states a term agreed upon but the contract is not enforceable under this paragraph beyond the quantity of goods shown in such writing.

Between merchants if within a reasonable time a writing in confirmation of the contract and sufficient against the sender is received and the party receiving it has reason to know its contents, it satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of this Code section against such party unless written notice of objection to its contents is given within ten days after it is received.

A contract which does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this Code section but which is valid in other respects is enforceable:

If the goods are to be specially manufactured for the buyer and are not suitable for sale to others in the ordinary course of the seller’s business and the seller, before notice of repudiation is received and under circumstances which reasonably indicate that the goods are for the buyer, has made either a substantial beginning of their manufacture or commitments for their procurement; or

If the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in his pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court that a contract for sale was made, but the contract is not enforceable under this provision beyond the quantity of goods admitted; or

With respect to goods for which payment has been made and accepted or which have been received and accepted (Code Section 11-2-606).

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—201, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

Party admitting contract may not claim benefit of statute of frauds. —

Party charged cannot admit fact of parol contract and at same time claim benefit of statute of frauds. Garrison v. Piatt, 113 Ga. App. 94, 147 S.E.2d 374 (1966).

O.C.G.A. §11-2-201(3)(b) was designed to prevent the statute of frauds itself from becoming an aid to fraud, by prohibiting one claiming the benefit of the statute who admits in the case the oral contract sued upon. Garrison v. Piatt, 113 Ga. App. 94, 147 S.E.2d 374 (1966).

An oral agreement for the sale of a horse for $35,000 was enforceable under O.C.G.A. §11-2-201(3)(b); the seller admitted that a contract was made for the sale of one horse. Rowland v. Scarborough Farms, LLC, 285 Ga. App. 831, 648 S.E.2d 151 (2007).

11-2-202.
Final written expression; parol or extrinsic evidence.

Terms with respect to which the confirmatory memoranda of the parties agree or which are otherwise set forth in a writing intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement with respect to such terms as are included therein may not be contradicted by evidence of any prior agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement but may be explained or supplemented:

By course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade (Code Section 11-1-303); and

By evidence of consistent additional terms unless the court finds the writing to have been intended also as a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—202, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3B-2/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a) for the former provisions, which read:
“By course of dealing or usage of trade (Code Section 11-1-205) or by course of performance (Code Section 11-2-208); and”.

Parties bound by writing. —

In dispute over meaning of contract and subsequent acts of parties to it during execution thereof which is not over language of the contract, a party is bound by what has been reduced to writing. R.S. Helms, Inc. v. GST Dev. Co., 135 Ga. App. 845, 219 S.E.2d 458 (1975).

O.C.G.A. §11-2-306(1) precludes a finding that a contract for requirements is too indefinite,

since the quantity is determined by the actual good faith requirements of the particular party. O.N. Jonas Co. v. Badische Corp., 706 F.2d 1161 (11th Cir. 1983).

Legislative Intent

Section intended to prevent false claims of oral warranties. —

O.C.G.A. §11-2-202 was intended to allow sellers to prevent buyers from making false claims of oral warranties in contract actions. City Dodge, Inc. v. Gardner, 232 Ga. 766, 208 S.E.2d 794 (1974).

11-2-203.
Seals inoperative.

The affixing of a seal to a writing evidencing a contract for sale or an offer to buy or sell goods does not constitute the writing a sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply to such a contract or offer.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—203, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-204.
Formation in general.

A contract for sale of goods may be made in any manner sufficient to show agreement, including conduct by both parties which recognizes the existence of such a contract.

An agreement sufficient to constitute a contract for sale may be found even though the moment of its making is undetermined.

Even though one or more terms are left open a contract for sale does not fail for indefiniteness if the parties have intended to make a contract and there is a reasonably certain basis for giving an appropriate remedy.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—204, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

Formalities required for contract formation reduced. —

The Uniform Commercial Code makes contracts easier to form and imposes a wider range of options than before; parties may form a contract through conduct rather than merely through the exchange of communications constituting “offer and acceptance.” D.N. Garner Co. v. Georgia Palm Beach Aluminum Window Corp., 233 Ga. App. 252, 504 S.E.2d 70 (1998).

Unpublished decision:

In a case in which a steel company signed a purchase order from a general contractor after it had rejected the terms of the purchase order and had submitted a counter-offer to the general contractor, a district court, in granting summary judgment in favor of the general contractor, correctly concluded that the record evidence disclosed no material fact in dispute; no reasonable jury could find that the general contractor and the steel company agreed to terms of a steel supply contract for the construction project. The requirement for a meeting of the minds necessary under O.C.G.A. §13-3-2 had not been met, and there was no agreement between the parties under O.C.G.A. §11-2-204. South Cent. Steel, Inc. v. McKnight Constr. Co., 263 Fed. Appx. 806 (11th Cir. 2008).

11-2-205.
Firm offers.

An offer by a merchant to buy or sell goods in a signed writing which by its terms gives assurance that it will be held open is not revocable, for lack of consideration, during the time stated or if no time is stated for a reasonable time, but in no event may such period of irrevocability exceed three months; but any such term of assurance on a form supplied by the offeree must be separately signed by the offeror.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—205, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-206.
Offer and acceptance in formation of contract.

Unless otherwise unambiguously indicated by the language or circumstances:

An offer to make a contract shall be construed as inviting acceptance in any manner and by any medium reasonable in the circumstances;

An order or other offer to buy goods for prompt or current shipment shall be construed as inviting acceptance either by a prompt promise to ship or by the prompt or current shipment of conforming or nonconforming goods, but such a shipment of nonconforming goods does not constitute an acceptance if the seller seasonably notifies the buyer that the shipment is offered only as an accommodation to the buyer.

Where the beginning of a requested performance is a reasonable mode of acceptance an offeror who is not notified of acceptance within a reasonable time may treat the offer as having lapsed before acceptance.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—206, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-207.
Additional terms in acceptance or confirmation.

A definite and seasonable expression of acceptance or a written confirmation which is sent within a reasonable time operates as an acceptance even though it states terms additional to or different from those offered or agreed upon, unless acceptance is expressly made conditional on assent to the additional or different terms.

The additional terms are to be construed as proposals for addition to the contract. Between merchants such terms become part of the contract unless:

The offer expressly limits acceptance to the terms of the offer;

They materially alter it; or

Notification of objection to them has already been given or is given within a reasonable time after notice of them is received.

Conduct by both parties which recognizes the existence of a contract is sufficient to establish a contract for sale although the writings of the parties do not otherwise establish a contract. In such case the terms of the particular contract consist of those terms on which the writings of the parties agree, together with any supplementary terms incorporated under any other provisions of this title.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—207, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-208.
Course of performance or practical construction.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3B-3/SB 65, effective January 1, 2016.

11-2-209.
Modification, rescission, and waiver.

An agreement modifying a contract within this article needs no consideration to be binding.

A signed agreement which excludes modification or rescission except by a signed writing cannot be otherwise modified or rescinded, but except as between merchants such a requirement on a form supplied by the merchant must be separately signed by the other party.

The requirements of the statute of frauds section of this article (Code Section 11-2-201) must be satisfied if the contract as modified is within its provisions.

Although an attempt at modification or rescission does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this Code section it can operate as a waiver.

A party who has made a waiver affecting an executory portion of the contract may retract the waiver by reasonable notification received by the other party that strict performance will be required of any term waived, unless the retraction would be unjust in view of a material change of position in reliance on the waiver.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—209, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-210.
Delegation of performance; assignment of rights.

A party may perform his duty through a delegate unless otherwise agreed or unless the other party has a substantial interest in having his original promisor perform or control the acts required by the contract. No delegation of performance relieves the party delegating of any duty to perform or any liability for breach.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-406, unless otherwise agreed all rights of either seller or buyer can be assigned except where the assignment would materially change the duty of the other party, or increase materially the burden or risk imposed on the other party by the contract, or impair materially the other party’s chance of obtaining return performance. A right to damages for breach of the whole contract or a right arising out of the assignor’s due performance of the assignor’s entire obligation can be assigned despite agreement otherwise.

The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in the seller’s interest under a contract is not a transfer that materially changes the duty of or increases materially the burden or risk imposed on the buyer or impairs materially the buyer’s chance of obtaining return performance within the purview of subsection (2) of this Code section unless, and then only to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material performance of the seller. Even in that event, the creation, attachment, perfection, and enforcement of the security interest remain effective, but (i) the seller is liable to the buyer for damages caused by the delegation to the extent that the damages could not reasonably be prevented by the buyer, and (ii) a court having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief, including cancellation of the contract for sale or an injunction against enforcement of the security interest or consummation of the enforcement.

Unless the circumstances indicate the contrary a prohibition of assignment of “the contract” is to be construed as barring only the delegation to the assignee of the assignor’s performance.

An assignment of “the contract” or of “all my rights under the contract” or an assignment in similar general terms is an assignment of rights and unless the language or the circumstances (as in an assignment for security) indicate the contrary, it is a delegation of performance of the duties of the assignor and its acceptance by the assignee constitutes a promise by the assignee to perform those duties. This promise is enforceable by either the assignor or the other party to the original contract.

The other party may treat any assignment which delegates performance as creating reasonable grounds for insecurity and may without prejudice to his or her rights against the assignor demand assurances from the assignee (Code Section 11-2-609).

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—210, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 5.

The 2001 amendment,

effective July 1, 2001, in subsection (2), in the first sentence, substituted “Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-406, unless” for “Unless” at the beginning, substituted “the other party by the contract” for “him by his contract”, and substituted “the other party’s” for “his”, and substituted “the assignor’s” for “his” in the second sentence; added subsection (3); redesignated former subsections (3) through (5) as present subsections (4) through (6), respectively; substituted “the assignee” for “him” in subsection (5); and inserted “or her” in subsection (6).